Hawaii statutes.
§122A-9 Arms and equipment; facilities.
(a) Subject to the availability of funds, the Hawaii state defense force shall
be armed and equipped as prescribed by the governor.

(b) The governor, on such terms and conditions
as may be prescribed by federal law and regulations and deemed acceptable by
the governor, may accept arms, equipment, supplies, and facilities made
available by the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof for the
use of the Hawaii state defense force.

(c) To the extent permitted by federal law and
regulations, armories and other facilities of the national guard, and such
other state facilities as may be available may be utilized for:

(1) Storage and maintenance of arms, equipment, and
supplies of the Hawaii state defense force; and

(2) Assembly, drill, and instruction of its members;

provided that such use shall not interfere with use
of armories or other national guard facilities by the national guard. [L 1987,
c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next